Tennessee, session 114, SB0175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-501, is amended by deleting
subdivision (x)(1) and substituting:
(x)
(1) Notwithstanding this part or chapter 28, part 1 of this title to the
contrary, the commissioner of correction may certify as eligible for parole an
inmate who:
(A) Is at least fifty-five (55) years of age;
(B) Has served a minimum of ten (10) years in custody;
(C) Is not serving a sentence for:
(i) A violent sexual offense, as defined in § 40-39-202; or
(ii) More than one (1) conviction for first degree murder,
pursuant to § 39-13-202, or facilitation of first degree murder; and
(D) Is not serving a sentence of imprisonment for life without
possibility of parole.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-21-227, is amended by deleting
subdivision (i)(2)(A) and substituting:
(2)
(A) Subdivision (i)(1) applies only to inmates who, due to the inmate's
chronically debilitated or incapacitated medical condition:
SB0175
000669
- 1 -

(i) Have a medical prognosis of mortality within one (1) year or
less; or
(ii) Are no longer able to perform at least one (1) of the activities
of daily living in a prison environment.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000669